Hawaii statutes.
[§211D-7] Limitations on state contribution
to reserve account. (a) The amount deposited by the department into a
participating financial institution's reserve account for any single loan
recipient may not exceed $100,000 during a three-year period.

(b) The maximum amount the department may
deposit into a reserve account for each capital access loan made under this
chapter is the lesser of $35,000 or an amount equal to:

(1) Eight per cent of the loan amount if:

(A) The borrower is an eligible enterprise
zone business located in an area designated as an enterprise zone under chapter
209E; or

(B) The borrower is a small or medium-size
business or a nonprofit organization that operates or proposes to operate a
child care facility or adult residential care home; or

(2) Six per cent of the loan amount for any other
borrower. [L 2000, c 290, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next